North Carolina, session 2025, SB678.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. USE OF STATE-OWNED PROPERTY FOR ONSITE CHILDCARE CENTERS
FOR STATE EMPLOYEES.
SECTION 1.(a) The Department of Administration shall report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations, no later than March 31, 2026, on the feasibility and
advisability of using obsolete or underutilized State-owned buildings (available buildings) to
house childcare facilities giving childcare priority to State employees. The report shall include
the following:
(1) Location of each available building.
(2) Estimated costs for upfitting each property to meet daycare licensing
standards.
(3) Estimated costs for asbestos and lead remediation.
(4) Barriers to the available buildings' use as a childcare facility.
SECTION 1.(b) Any project undertaken by the State to build or renovate property
having a budget greater than five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall include a child care center or
adult day care center if more than 250 people would work in the building. This requirement
includes current projects which have not broken ground by July 1, 2025, unless one or both of
the following exceptions apply:
(1) Inclusion of either type of center would delay the project by six months or
more.
(2) Inclusion of either type of center would increase the project cost by 10% or
more.

PART II. CHILDCARE FOR STATE EMPLOYEES
SECTION 2.(a) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall
establish a pilot program for onsite childcare for State employees as follows:
*S678-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall contract with
a private commercial childcare provider to establish three childcare centers
for State employees use to be established on State-owned property that is
unused or underutilized.
(2) Priority in contracting shall be given to commercial childcare providers who
currently operate five or fewer facilities and provide high quality childcare.
(3) The Division of Child Development and Early Education must include the
following terms in the contract with the commercial childcare providers:
a. The childcare facility must operate an apprenticeship program in
conjunction with a public or private university or community college
who operates an early childcare education program.
b. The childcare center must comply with the requirements established
by the Division of Child Development and Early Education for
apprenticeship program.
c. The childcare center must maintain the operation of the apprenticeship
program for so long as the childcare center is housed in state-owned
property and the university or community college is willing to
continue the partnership.
d. The State will provide the upfit cost of the space to meet the licensure
requirements at reasonable levels that are customary at the operators'
other facilities and those similarly situated and provide use of the space
rent free, notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 146-29.1.
e. The lease terms for state-owned property must be approved as required
by G.S. 146-27.
SECTION 2.(b) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall
create the requirements for the apprenticeship program and pair the childcare centers with a
university or community college early education program utilizing parameters similar to the
Durham Childcare Apprenticeship Program.
SECTION 2.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Resources the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the 2025-2026
fiscal year for the Division of Child Development and Early Education's use in establishing the
childcare centers as required by Section 2(a) of this act.
SECTION 2.(d) If any expenses are incurred by the State for asbestos or lead
remediation in establishing the childcare centers required by Section 2.(a) of this act, the State
shall be eligible for reimbursement from the Asbestos and Lead Remediation Fund subject to the
rules of the fund for up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
SECTION 2.(e) By April 1, 2027, the Division of Child Development and Early
Education shall report on and make recommendations to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
General Government, and the Fiscal Research Division the status of the implementation of the
pilot program including successes, concerns, problems encountered, enrollment, and
expenditures.
SECTION 2.(f) Sections 2(c) and 2(d) of this act are effective July 1, 2025.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 678-First Edition